Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/en_Supplemental.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1213 N 1
SFX 1213 0 mpress .

SFX 1214 N 1
SFX 1214 0 mpromised .

SFX 1215 N 1
SFX 1215 0 mptional .

SFX 1216 N 1
SFX 1216 0 mptions .

SFX 1217 N 1
SFX 1217 0 mptory .

SFX 1218 N 1
SFX 1218 0 mputable .

SFX 1219 N 1
SFX 1219 0 ms .

SFX 1220 N 1
SFX 1220 0 municate .

SFX 1221 N 1
SFX 1221 0 municated .

SFX 1222 N 1
SFX 1222 0 municates .

SFX 1223 N 1
SFX 1223 0 municating .

SFX 1224 N 1
SFX 1224 0 myocytes .

SFX 1225 N 1
SFX 1225 0 myopathies .

SFX 1226 N 1
SFX 1226 0 myopathy .

SFX 1227 N 1
SFX 1227 0 mysium .

SFX 1228 N 1
SFX 1228 0 n .

SFX 1229 N 1
SFX 1229 0 na .

SFX 1230 N 1
SFX 1230 0 na Australis .

SFX 1231 N 1
SFX 1231 0 na Borealis .

SFX 1232 N 1
SFX 1232 0 nais .

SFX 1233 N 1
SFX 1233 0 nal .

SFX 1234 N 1
SFX 1234 0 namide .

SFX 1235 N 1
SFX 1235 0 nan .

SFX 1236 N 1
SFX 1236 0 naro .

SFX 1237 N 1
SFX 1237 0 nary .

SFX 1238 N 1
SFX 1238 0 nas .

SFX 1239 N 1
SFX 1239 0 nasal .

SFX 1240 N 1
SFX 1240 0 nata .

SFX 1241 N 1
SFX 1241 0 nate .

SFX 1242 N 1
SFX 1242 0 nated .

SFX 1243 N 1
SFX 1243 0 nates .

SFX 1244 N 1
SFX 1244 0 nation .

SFX 1245 N 1
SFX 1245 0 natologist .

SFX 1246 N 1
SFX 1246 0 natology .

SFX 1247 N 1
SFX 1247 0 nator .

SFX 1248 N 1
SFX 1248 0 naut .

SFX 1249 N 1
SFX 1249 0 nca .

SFX 1250 N 1
SFX 1250 0 nça .

SFX 1251 N 1
SFX 1251 0 nce .

SFX 1252 N 1
SFX 1252 0 nces .

SFX 1253 N 1
SFX 1253 0 ncheng .

SFX 1254 N 1
SFX 1254 0 ncies .

SFX 1255 N 1
SFX 1255 0 ncillo .

SFX 1256 N 1
SFX 1256 0 ncy .

SFX 1257 N 1
SFX 1257 0 ndaise .

SFX 1258 N 1
SFX 1258 0 ndaises .

SFX 1259 N 1
SFX 1259 0 ndweogo .

SFX 1260 N 1
SFX 1260 0 ne .

SFX 1261 N 1
SFX 1261 0 neal .

SFX 1262 N 1
SFX 1262 0 ned .

SFX 1263 N 1
SFX 1263 0 neh .

SFX 1264 N 1
SFX 1264 0 neism .

SFX 1265 N 1
SFX 1265 0 neisms .

SFX 1266 N 1
SFX 1266 0 neities .

SFX 1267 N 1
SFX 1267 0 neity .

SFX 1268 N 1
SFX 1268 0 neotomy .

SFX 1269 N 1
SFX 1269 0 ner .

SFX 1270 N 1
SFX 1270 0 neric .

SFX 1271 N 1
SFX 1271 0 nerical .

SFX 1272 N 1
SFX 1272 0 nerous .

SFX 1273 N 1
SFX 1273 0 ners .

SFX 1274 N 1
SFX 1274 0 nes .

SFX 1275 N 1
SFX 1275 0 ness .

SFX 1276 N 1
SFX 1276 0 nesses .

SFX 1277 N 1
SFX 1277 0 net .

SFX 1278 N 1
SFX 1278 0 netically .

SFX 1279 N 1
SFX 1279 0 neurium .

SFX 1280 N 1
SFX 1280 0 nfessed .

SFX 1281 N 1
SFX 1281 0 nformably .

SFX 1282 N 1
SFX 1282 0 nformist .

SFX 1283 N 1
SFX 1283 0 nformity .

SFX 1284 N 1
SFX 1284 0 nfu .

SFX 1285 N 1
SFX 1285 0 ng .

SFX 1286 N 1
SFX 1286 0 ngas .

SFX 1287 N 1
SFX 1287 0 ngcheng .

SFX 1288 N 1
SFX 1288 0 ngenialities .

SFX 1289 N 1
SFX 1289 0 ngeniality .

SFX 1290 N 1
SFX 1290 0 nggyi .

SFX 1291 N 1
SFX 1291 0 ngho .

SFX 1292 N 1
SFX 1292 0 nghua .

SFX 1293 N 1
SFX 1293 0 ngkang .

SFX 1294 N 1
SFX 1294 0 ngning .

SFX 1295 N 1
SFX 1295 0 ngping .

SFX 1296 N 1
SFX 1296 0 ngtai .

SFX 1297 N 1
SFX 1297 0 ngyang .

SFX 1298 N 1
SFX 1298 0 ngyi .

SFX 1299 N 1
SFX 1299 0 nhongor .

SFX 1300 N 1
SFX 1300 0 ni .

SFX 1301 N 1
SFX 1301 0 nia .

SFX 1302 N 1
SFX 1302 0 nialness .

SFX 1303 N 1
SFX 1303 0 nialnesses .

SFX 1304 N 1
SFX 1304 0 nic .

SFX 1305 N 1
SFX 1305 0 nical .

SFX 1306 N 1
SFX 1306 0 nics .

SFX 1307 N 1
SFX 1307 0 nik .

SFX 1308 N 1
SFX 1308 0 niks .

SFX 1309 N 1
SFX 1309 0 ning .

SFX 1310 N 1
SFX 1310 0 nious .

SFX 1311 N 1
SFX 1311 0 nis .

SFX 1312 N 1
SFX 1312 0 nisation .

SFX 1313 N 1
SFX 1313 0 nisations .

SFX 1314 N 1
SFX 1314 0 nise .

SFX 1315 N 1
SFX 1315 0 nised .

SFX 1316 N 1
SFX 1316 0 niser .

SFX 1317 N 1
SFX 1317 0 nises .

SFX 1318 N 1
SFX 1318 0 nish .

SFX 1319 N 1
SFX 1319 0 nising .

SFX 1320 N 1
SFX 1320 0 nism .

SFX 1321 N 1
SFX 1321 0 nisms .

SFX 1322 N 1
SFX 1322 0 nismus .

SFX 1323 N 1
SFX 1323 0 nite .

SFX 1324 N 1
SFX 1324 0 nites .

SFX 1325 N 1
SFX 1325 0 nitides .

SFX 1326 N 1
SFX 1326 0 nitis .

SFX 1327 N 1
SFX 1327 0 nium .

SFX 1328 N 1
SFX 1328 0 niums .

SFX 1329 N 1
SFX 1329 0 nivasa .

SFX 1330 N 1
SFX 1330 0 nizer .

SFX 1331 N 1
SFX 1331 0 nje .

SFX 1332 N 1
SFX 1332 0 nji .

SFX 1333 N 1
SFX 1333 0 njiang .

SFX 1334 N 1
SFX 1334 0 njugated .

SFX 1335 N 1
SFX 1335 0 nka .

SFX 1336 N 1
SFX 1336 0 nle .

SFX 1337 N 1
SFX 1337 0 nmi .

SFX 1338 N 1
SFX 1338 0 nmin .

SFX 1339 N 1
SFX 1339 0 nnectedness .

SFX 1340 N 1
SFX 1340 0 nnectednesses .

SFX 1341 N 1
SFX 1341 0 nness .

SFX 1342 N 1
SFX 1342 0 nnesses .

SFX 1343 N 1
SFX 1343 0 nocele .

SFX 1344 N 1
SFX 1344 0 nopyrite .

SFX 1345 N 1
SFX 1345 0 nopyrites .

SFX 1346 N 1
SFX 1346 0 nosa .

SFX 1347 N 1
SFX 1347 0 noscope .

SFX 1348 N 1
SFX 1348 0 ns .

SFX 1349 N 1
SFX 1349 0 nscientious .

SFX 1350 N 1
SFX 1350 0 nscientiousness .

SFX 1351 N 1
SFX 1351 0 nsolable .

SFX 1352 N 1
SFX 1352 0 nstipated .

SFX 1353 N 1
SFX 1353 0 nstraint .

SFX 1354 N 1
SFX 1354 0 nstraints .

SFX 1355 N 1
SFX 1355 0 nstricted .

SFX 1356 N 1
SFX 1356 0 nstructive .

SFX 1357 N 1
SFX 1357 0 n't .

SFX 1358 N 1
SFX 1358 0 nt .

SFX 1359 N 1
SFX 1359 0 ntacted .

SFX 1360 N 1
SFX 1360 0 ntai .

SFX 1361 N 1
SFX 1361 0 ntained .

SFX 1362 N 1
SFX 1362 0 ntaminating .

SFX 1363 N 1
SFX 1363 0 ntly .

SFX 1364 N 1
SFX 1364 0 ntracted .

SFX 1365 N 1
SFX 1365 0 ntrived .

SFX 1366 N 1
SFX 1366 0 nts .

SFX 1367 N 1
SFX 1367 0 ntun .

SFX 1368 N 1
SFX 1368 0 nucleate .

SFX 1369 N 1
SFX 1369 0 nue .

SFX 1370 N 1
SFX 1370 0 nus .

SFX 1371 N 1
SFX 1371 0 nvertible .

SFX 1372 N 1
SFX 1372 0 nwood .

SFX 1373 N 1
SFX 1373 0 nwoods .

SFX 1374 N 1
SFX 1374 0 nxiang .

SFX 1375 N 1
SFX 1375 0 nyang .

SFX 1376 N 1
SFX 1376 0 nyi .

SFX 1377 N 1
SFX 1377 0 nyu .

SFX 1378 N 1
SFX 1378 0 nzheng .

SFX 1379 N 1
SFX 1379 0 nzhou .

SFX 1380 N 1
SFX 1380 0 o .

SFX 1381 N 1
SFX 1381 0 oara .

SFX 1382 N 1
SFX 1382 0 oboride .

SFX 1383 N 1
SFX 1383 0 oc .

SFX 1384 N 1
SFX 1384 0 ocardiogram .

SFX 1385 N 1
SFX 1385 0 ocardiograph .

SFX 1386 N 1
SFX 1386 0 ocardiography .

SFX 1387 N 1
SFX 1387 0 ochrome .

SFX 1388 N 1
SFX 1388 0 ochromes .

SFX 1389 N 1
SFX 1389 0 odium .

SFX 1390 N 1
SFX 1390 0 odiums .

SFX 1391 N 1
SFX 1391 0 odization .

SFX 1392 N 1
SFX 1392 0 odontia .

SFX 1393 N 1
SFX 1393 0 odontias .

SFX 1394 N 1
SFX 1394 0 odontic .

SFX 1395 N 1
SFX 1395 0 odontitis .

SFX 1396 N 1
SFX 1396 0 odontitises .

SFX 1397 N 1
SFX 1397 0 oencephalogram .

SFX 1398 N 1
SFX 1398 0 oencephalograph .

SFX 1399 N 1
SFX 1399 0 oencephalography .

SFX 1400 N 1
SFX 1400 0 ofan .

SFX 1401 N 1
SFX 1401 0 oform .

SFX 1402 N 1
SFX 1402 0 ogbo .

SFX 1403 N 1
SFX 1403 0 ogen .

SFX 1404 N 1
SFX 1404 0 ogic .

SFX 1405 N 1
SFX 1405 0 ogies .

SFX 1406 N 1
SFX 1406 0 ogist .

SFX 1407 N 1
SFX 1407 0 ogists .

SFX 1408 N 1
SFX 1408 0 ogram .

SFX 1409 N 1
SFX 1409 0 ography .

SFX 1410 N 1
SFX 1410 0 ogy .

SFX 1411 N 1
SFX 1411 0 oid .

SFX 1412 N 1
SFX 1412 0 oidal .

SFX 1413 N 1
SFX 1413 0 oidoses .

SFX 1414 N 1
SFX 1414 0 oidosis .

SFX 1415 N 1
SFX 1415 0 oids .

SFX 1416 N 1
SFX 1416 0 ol .

SFX 1417 N 1
SFX 1417 0 ola .

SFX 1418 N 1
SFX 1418 0 olalia .

SFX 1419 N 1
SFX 1419 0 oless .

SFX 1420 N 1
SFX 1420 0 olike .

SFX 1421 N 1
SFX 1421 0 olite .

SFX 1422 N 1
SFX 1422 0 olites .

SFX 1423 N 1
SFX 1423 0 olous .

SFX 1424 N 1
SFX 1424 0 olyses .

SFX 1425 N 1
SFX 1425 0 olysis .

SFX 1426 N 1
SFX 1426 0 olytic .

SFX 1427 N 1
SFX 1427 0 oma .

SFX 1428 N 1
SFX 1428 0 omer .

SFX 1429 N 1
SFX 1429 0 ometer .

SFX 1430 N 1
SFX 1430 0 ometers .

SFX 1431 N 1
SFX 1431 0 ometric .

SFX 1432 N 1
SFX 1432 0 ometrical .

SFX 1433 N 1
SFX 1433 0 ometries .

SFX 1434 N 1
SFX 1434 0 ometry .

SFX 1435 N 1
SFX 1435 0 omically .

SFX 1436 N 1
SFX 1436 0 omiya .

SFX 1437 N 1
SFX 1437 0 omorphic .

SFX 1438 N 1
SFX 1438 0 omorphous .

SFX 1439 N 1
SFX 1439 0 omyces .

SFX 1440 N 1
SFX 1440 0 omycetal .

SFX 1441 N 1
SFX 1441 0 omycete .

SFX 1442 N 1
SFX 1442 0 omycetes .

SFX 1443 N 1
SFX 1443 0 omycetous .

SFX 1444 N 1
SFX 1444 0 omycin .

SFX 1445 N 1
SFX 1445 0 omycins .

SFX 1446 N 1
SFX 1446 0 omycoses .

SFX 1447 N 1
SFX 1447 0 omycosis .
