Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/en_Supplemental.dic
abdominous/1275
abduce/510,1348,1358,1682
abelia/1228
amative/1275,1276
ameba/1228,1682
amnio/1304,1682,1794,1816
antecede/510,1254,1256,1363,1682
appetising/1275
Arauca/1301
associable/1275
astringe/1251
baboo/1318,1682
Baja/1228,1299
Bello/1229
Bobo/1236
Boke/1380
Braga/1249,1250
Brinkman/1228
calcic/1423
Cayo/1228
Ceti/1331
changeful/1275,1276
Ching/1417
cither/1228,1682
clavi/1277
clearcut/1275,1838
coldhearted/1275,1276
Coro/1230,1231
cyme/1260,1682
cytol/1404,2012,2013,2014,2016
defervesce/1251,1358
dehisce/510,1251,1252,1358,1682
Deneb/1417
deterge/1251,1252,1254,1256
diazo/1327,1328,1852,1995
diptera/1228,1348
Dongli/1285
Dunhua/1285
dystopia/1228,1682
ectozoa/1228
effortful/1275,1276
entozoa/1228,1348
epizoa/1228
Eua/1228
Ewa/1228
feebleminded/1275,1276
forego/646,882,1260
foreshow/565,882,1228,1682
foresightful/1275
fugacious/1275,1276
Fujin/1436
gaster/1441
Gia/1285
greensick/1275,1276
Handa/1228
holla/1257,1258,1682
huffish/1275,1276
inapposite/1275,1276
incorrupt/905,907,1275,1276
inexplicit/1275,1276
inspan/1262,1309,1682
insula/557,1358,1366,1642,1643
intumesce/1251,1252,1256,1358
kolkhoz/646,1307,1308
Kord/1400
lepidoptera/1228,1348
lightless/1275
Luzia/1301
macon/1232,1682
Maia/1229
mamo/1255
Marica/1380
medusa/557,1228,1348,1682
meshugge/1263,1269
millennia/1228
misgive/1228,1682
Misha/1228
Montag/1274
mucin/1411,1513,1682
nagi/1240
nard/1380,1461,1464,1682
neuroblast/1427,1682
nihil/943,1380,1682
operose/1275,1276
osteoblast/1427,1682
outspan/1262,1309,1682
oversew/565,882,1228,1682
Padova/1228
parve/1369
pervious/1275,1276
petitio/1237
physical/924,925,1275,1276
Pina/1285,1590
planaria/1228,1348,1682
polyzoa/1228,1348
prankish/1275,1276
Priya/1335
propanol/1416,1682
Rey/557,1346
Rhode/1228
Ribeira/1380
riskless/1275
sannyasi/1228
sapid/935,943,1275,1276
Satu/1228,1528
savorless/1275
sesquipedalia/1228,1348
she's/1357
sightsee/882,1228,1682
sizeable/1275
songful/1275,1276
souther/1320,1321,1341,1342,1372,1373,1682
spongioblast/1427
sylva/1323,1324,1682
Tama/1228,1229
taxon/1428,1435,1682
Thua/1228
Tieli/1285
Timis/1381
trypsin/1403
unappetising/1275
undergrow/1228
undutiful/1275,1276
unfavourable/1275
unpermissive/1275
unpointed/1275
urobilin/1403
vibrio/1228,1304,1348,1682
vinegarish/1275
wester/1314,1315,1682
Zala/1367
